Utah statutes.
53A-3-431.   Health insurance mandates.

A local school board and the governing body of a charter school shall include in a health plan it offers to school district employees, or charter school employees insurance mandates in accordance with Section 31A-22-605.5.



Enacted by Chapter 127, 2012 General Session

